Utah statutes.
20A-3-506.   False information on provisional ballot envelope.

(1)  A person may not wilfully falsify information on a provisional ballot envelope.

(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 2006 General Session

